Nebraska, session 109, LB785.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-101, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-101 Sections 28-101 to 28-1357, 28-1601 to 28-1603, and 28-1701
and section 3 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska
Criminal Code.
Sec. 2. Section 28-618, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-618 For purposes of sections 28-618 to 28-630 and section 3 of
this act:
(1) Account holder means the person or business entity named on the
face of a financial transaction device for whose benefit the financial
transaction device is issued by an issuer;
(2) Acquirer means any business organization, financial institution,
or agent of such organization or institution which authorizes a merchant
to accept payment by financial transaction device for money, property,
services, or anything else of value;
(3) Automated banking device means any machine which, when properly
activated by a financial transaction device or a personal identification
code, may be used for any purpose for which a financial transaction
device is issued;
(4) Counterfeit financial transaction device means any financial
transaction device which is fictitious, altered, forged, stolen, obtained
as part of a scheme to defraud, or otherwise unlawfully obtained and
which may or may not be embossed with account information or a company
logo or any facsimile, false representation, depiction, or component of a
financial transaction device;
(5) Embossing means any process in which account numbers are placed
on financial transaction devices that results in the number being raised
from the surface of the device;
(6) Expired financial transaction device means a financial
transaction device which is no longer valid because the term shown on it
-2-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
has elapsed;
(7) Financial transaction device means any instrument or device
whether known as a credit card, credit plate, bank service card, banking
card, check guarantee card, debit card, electronic funds transfer card,
or account number representing a financial account. Such device shall
affect the financial interest, standing, or obligation of the financial
account for services or financial payments for money, credit, property,
or services;
(8) Financial-transaction-device-making equipment means any
equipment, impression, machine, mechanism, plate, or other device
designed, used, or capable of being used to produce a financial
transaction device, a counterfeit financial transaction device, or any
aspect or component of a financial transaction device;
(9) Holographic means a photographic method that uses laser light to
produce three-dimensional images;
(10) Intent to defraud means an unlawful attempt to secure money,
credit, property, or services from an issuer, without permission of the
account holder, for the benefit of any person other than the account
holder;
(11) Issuer means any person or any financial or business entity
that acquires financial rights by issuing, canceling, controlling, or
distributing a financial transaction device;
(12) Magnetic encoding means any electronically encoded account
holder information which is placed on a magnetic strip on the financial
transaction device and is capable of being read by an electronic terminal
such as an automatic teller machine or an electronic terminal at a
merchant location also known as a point-of-sale terminal;
(13) Personal identification code means any grouping of letters,
numbers, or symbols assigned to the account holder of a financial
transaction device by the issuer to permit authorized electronic access
of that account;
-3-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
(14) Receives or receiving means acquiring possession or control of
or accepting as security for a loan a financial transaction device;
(15) Revoked financial transaction device means a financial
transaction device which is no longer valid because permission to use it
has been suspended or terminated by the issuer;
(16) Sales form means any written, electronic, magnetic, or printed
record of a financial transaction involving use of a financial
transaction device;
(17) Sales form processing services means services provided to
enable a person to obtain payment or credit for sales forms;
(18) Sales form processor means any bank, financial institution, or
other entity which with authority from a bona fide association of issuers
provides sales form processing services;
(19) Service mark means a word, name, symbol, or other device or any
combination thereof to identify the goods or services of the entity from
the goods and services of another entity;
(20) Skimmer device means an electronic or other device used to
capture, record, store or transmit data from a financial transaction
device or to capture or record an account holder's personal
identification code;
(21) To falsely alter a financial transaction device means to change
such device without the authority of anyone entitled to grant such
authority, whether in complete or incomplete form, by means of erasure,
obliteration, deletion, insertion of new matter, transposition of matter,
or any other means, so that such device in its altered form falsely
appears or purports to be in all respects an authentic creation of or
fully authorized by its ostensible issuer;
(22) To falsely complete a financial transaction device means to
transform an incomplete device into a complete one by adding, inserting,
or changing matter without the authority of anyone entitled to grant such
authority, so that the complete device falsely appears or purports to be
-4-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
in all respects an authentic creation of or fully authorized by its
ostensible issuer;
(23) To falsely make a financial transaction device means to make or
manufacture a device, whether complete or incomplete, which purports to
be an authentic creation of its ostensible issuer but which is fictitious
or, if real, the ostensible issuer did not authorize the making or the
manufacturing thereof; and
(24) Traffic means to distribute, dispense, sell, transfer, or
otherwise dispose of property or to buy, receive, possess, obtain control
of, or use property with the intent to dispense, distribute, sell,
transfer, or otherwise dispose of such property.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section, postal service means: (a)
The United States Postal Service or a contractor of the United States
Postal Service; or (b) any commercial courier that delivers mail.
(2) A person commits the offense of unlawful conduct involving a
mail receptacle key or lock if, with the intent to defraud or to deprive
another of that person's property, the person obtains, possesses,
duplicates, transfers, or uses a key or lock adopted by a postal service
for any box or other authorized receptacle for the deposit or delivery of
mail.
(3) A violation of this section is a Class IV felony.
Sec. 4. Section 28-627.03, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-627.03 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Financial transaction offense means any violation of sections
28-618 to 28-630 and section 3 of this act for which the punishment is a
felony; and
(b) Leadership position means a position in which a person acts as a
principal administrator, organizer, supervisor, or manager or otherwise
leads or directs other persons.
(2) A person is engaged in a continuing criminal enterprise if such
-5-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
person commits any financial transaction offense and:
(a) Such offense is part of a continuing series of financial
transaction offenses;
(b) Such series of offenses is undertaken by such person in concert
with two or more other persons with respect to whom such person acts in a
leadership position; and
(c) Such person obtains substantial income or resources from such
activities.
(3) A violation of this section shall be punished as a:
(a) Class II felony if the enterprise, or any other enterprise in
which the defendant was in a leadership position:
(i) Included three or fewer persons; or
(ii) Had at least two million dollars but less than five million
dollars in gross receipts during any twelve-month period of the
enterprise's existence;
(b) Class ID felony if the enterprise, or any other enterprise in
which the defendant was in a leadership position:
(i) Included four or more persons but fewer than ten persons; or
(ii) Had at least five million dollars but less than ten million
dollars in gross receipts during any twelve-month period of the
enterprise's existence; and
(c) Class IC felony if the enterprise, or any other enterprise in
which the defendant was in a leadership position:
(i) Included ten or more persons; or
(ii) Had at least ten million dollars in gross receipts during any
twelve-month period of the enterprise's existence.
Sec. 5. Section 28-627.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-627.04 In addition to the existing penalties available for a
violation of sections 28-618 to 28-630 and section 3 of this act, a
sentencing court may order forfeiture as provided in sections 28-1601 to
-6-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
28-1603.
Sec. 6. Section 28-1601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1601 (1) For purposes of sections 28-1601 to 28-1603:
(a) Covered offense means a violation of the Child Sexual Abuse
Material Prevention Act, subsection (1) of section 28-416, or section
28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105, 28-1105.01, or 28-1107 or a financial
transaction offense;
(b) Electronic communication device has the same meaning as in
section 28-833;
(c) Financial transaction offense means a violation of sections
28-618 to 28-630 and section 3 of this act; and
(d) Gambling device has the same meaning as in section 28-1101.
(2) In addition to existing penalties for a violation of a covered
offense, a court may order forfeiture of any money, securities,
negotiable instruments, firearms, conveyances, or electronic
communication devices; any equipment, components, peripherals, software,
hardware, or accessories related to electronic communication devices; or
any gambling devices if:
(a) The owner or possessor of the property has been convicted of a
covered offense;
(b) The information charging such violation specifically requests
the forfeiture of property upon conviction and is prepared pursuant to
section 28-1602; and
(c) It is found by clear and convincing evidence that such property
was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered
offense.
(3) Following the filing of an information charging a violation of a
covered offense that specifically seeks forfeiture of any property listed
in subsection (2) of this section, the defendant may request a pretrial
hearing to determine the existence of probable cause to believe that the
-7-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
property specifically sought to be forfeited was derived from, used, or
intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense. The request for a
hearing pursuant to this section must be filed with the district court in
which the criminal proceeding is pending within thirty days after the
filing of the information.
(4)(a) At any time after the filing of the information in district
court and prior to final disposition of the criminal case, any person,
other than the defendant, with a claimed legal interest in the property
may petition to intervene in the district court with jurisdiction over
the criminal case for the specific and limited purpose of demonstrating
such person's legal interest in the property and such person's lack of
actual knowledge that such property was derived from, used, or intended
to be used to facilitate a covered offense.
(b) In the petition to intervene, the intervening person shall, at a
minimum, state facts demonstrating such person's legal interest in the
property and such person's lack of actual knowledge regarding the use or
intended use of the property.
(5) Within thirty days after filing a motion to intervene, the
district court shall conduct an evidentiary hearing on the matter. At the
conclusion of such hearing, the court may order that any or all of the
property be returned to the intervening claimant after it is no longer
needed as evidence in the criminal case upon a showing by the claimant by
a preponderance of the evidence:
(a) That the claimant has a legally recognized interest in the
property; and
(b) Either (i) that such property was acquired by the claimant in
good faith and the claimant did not have actual knowledge that such
property was derived from, used, or intended to be used to facilitate a
covered offense or (ii) that the property seized was not derived from,
used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense.
(6) The court, on its own motion or upon application of the
-8-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
claimant, may permit the claimant to proceed in forma pauperis under
sections 25-2301 to 25-2310. The court, on its own motion or upon
application of the claimant, may appoint counsel to represent the
claimant if the claimant is indigent. If the claimant asserts indigency,
the court shall make a reasonable inquiry to determine the claimant's
financial condition and may require the claimant to execute an affidavit
of indigency for filing with the clerk of the court.
(7) After conviction but prior to sentencing for a covered offense
in cases in which the prosecuting authority has specifically requested
forfeiture of property, the district court shall conduct an evidentiary
hearing at which the prosecuting authority must prove by clear and
convincing evidence what specific amount or portion of the property
specifically enumerated in the criminal information was derived from,
used, or intended for use in furtherance of a covered offense. At the
conclusion of such hearing, the court shall make specific findings of
fact indicating what amount or portion of the property sought to be
forfeited by the state was derived from, used, or intended to be used to
facilitate a covered offense. The court shall order any amount or portion
of the property not proven by the state to be derived from, used, or
intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense or the fair market
value of the legally recognized interest in such property be returned to
its rightful and legal owner or interest holder.
(8)(a) The court shall order that any amount or portion of property
proven by the state by clear and convincing evidence to be derived from,
used, or intended to be used to facilitate a covered offense be forfeited
to the state and disposition of such property be conducted in accordance
with this subsection and section 28-1439.02 at such time as the property
is no longer required as evidence in any criminal proceeding.
(b) As part of any disposition of property, the court may order
that: (i) For a covered offense other than a financial transaction
offense, any money, securities, or negotiable instruments be distributed
-9-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
as provided in Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska;
(ii) for a financial transaction offense, any money, securities, or
negotiable instruments be credited to the Financial Fraud Victims'
Reimbursement Fund for the purposes described in section 84-222; (iii)
any conveyances be sold or put to official use by the seizing agency for
a period of not more than one year and when such property is no longer
necessary for official use or at the end of two years, whichever comes
first, such property shall be sold. Proceeds from the sale of any
conveyance shall be distributed as provided in Article VII, section 5, of
the Constitution of Nebraska; (iv) any electronic communication devices,
any equipment, components, peripherals, software, hardware, or
accessories related to electronic communication devices, or any gambling
devices be destroyed by a law enforcement agency; and (v) the disposition
of firearms shall be effectuated pursuant to section 29-820.
(c) As used in this subsection, official use means use directly in
connection with enforcement of the Child Sexual Abuse Material Prevention
Act, the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, sections 28-618 to 28-630 and
section 3 of this act, or section 28-1102, 28-1103, 28-1104, 28-1105,
28-1105.01, or 28-1107.
(9) Any money, securities, negotiable instruments, firearms,
conveyances, or electronic communication devices; any equipment,
components, peripherals, software, hardware, or accessories related to
electronic communication devices; or any gambling devices may be
forfeited pursuant to a plea agreement between the state and the
defendant subject to notice to or approval of the court.
(10) Subdivision (2)(a) of this section does not apply if the owner
or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States
before charges are filed or a conviction obtained.
(11) Subdivision (2)(b) of this section does not apply if the owner
or possessor of the property dies or is removed from the United States
before charges are filed so long as the statute of limitations for a
-10-

LB785 LB785
2026 2026
covered offense has not expired.
(12) Subdivision (2)(a) of this section does not apply if the owner
or possessor of the property is unknown or incapable of being determined
for some legitimate reason or fails to appear in court as ordered after
prosecution for a covered offense is commenced and is not apprehended
within twelve months after the failure to appear order was issued by the
court.
(13) If the owner or possessor of the property fails to appear in
court as ordered after prosecution for a covered offense is commenced but
appears or is apprehended within twelve months after the failure to
appear order was issued by the court, the court may order the owner or
possessor of the property, as a part of any sentence imposed for either
the failure to appear or the conviction for a covered offense, to pay a
storage fee of one hundred dollars per month for each month the property
was held following the issuance of the failure to appear order.
Sec. 7. Original sections 28-101, 28-618, 28-627.03, 28-627.04, and
28-1601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-11-